Washington statutes.
RCW 15.135.100

Certain records not subject to public disclosure.

(1) Any information or record obtained directly from the federal government or from others under a contract with the federal government is exempt from public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW if the information or record is exempt from disclosure under federal law including, but not limited to, the federal freedom of information act.

(2) Any portion of a record obtained by the department pursuant to this chapter is exempt from public inspection and copying under chapter 42.56 RCW if it is personal financial information, proprietary data, or trade secrets and the person submitting the record to the department has designated the information as personal financial information, proprietary data, or trade secrets.

[ 2018 c 106 s 10.]